Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,157
Conflict of interest; sections; how construed.

(1) Nothing contained in sections 71-15,149 to 71-15,157 shall prohibit a housing agency of a city of the second class or of a village from purchasing or otherwise acquiring any goods or services from a provider of such goods or services owned in whole or in part by a housing agency official if (a) the provider is the sole source for the goods or services within the area of operation of the housing agency, (b) the cost of the goods or services does not exceed three thousand dollars in any one instance, or (c) the provider has not received more than ten thousand dollars from the housing agency in any one calendar year.

(2) Nothing contained in sections 71-15,149 to 71-15,157 shall prohibit a housing agency from entering into and performing contracts, agreements, and arrangements with any nonprofit entity or any affiliate, whether for-profit or nonprofit in character, notwithstanding that some or all of the housing agency's representatives or public officials or legislators who exercise functions or responsibilities with respect to a housing agency's developments also serve as directors or in other policymaking positions in such nonprofit entity or affiliate. Such service by housing agency representatives, public officials, or legislators is expressly permitted under the Nebraska Housing Agency Act.

(3) The provisions of sections 71-15,149 to 71-15,157 shall not apply to any general depositary agreement entered into with a bank or other financial institution regulated by the federal government or to utility service for which rates are fixed by a state or local agency. The provisions of sections 71-15,149 to 71-15,157 shall not apply to prohibit any present or former tenant commissioner from acting upon housing agency business affecting residents unless such business directly involves a resident organization with respect to which such commissioner occupies a policymaking position or serves as a member of the governing board.

(4) Nothing contained in sections 71-15,149 to 71-15,157 shall prohibit service as a commissioner by the chief elected official or any member of the governing body of any city, county, or other public agency which is served by a housing agency.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 86;

Laws 2018, LB304, § 5.
July 19, 2018